id_ID/id_ID.dic
aksara/B0Kc
aris/B0BaBka0
arti/B0DkKcMkPaS0a0n0
baharu/DtMiMtP0Pai0
baik/B0BaDtKaM0MiMkMtPaRaRiS0SnT0nl
bambang/BtS0SaT0
baru/DtKaM0MiMkP0PaMtT0Tkl0o0
batas/B0BaBkDiKuM0MiP0PaRaT0a0i0o0
bawa/BaBqD0DkM0MkP0PaSqSPT0O0a0nlo0
belah/B0BaBtM0MwMxMSP0PaS0T0a0nl
belas/B0KSKtMkP0S0SQa0o0
beritahu/A2D0DkM0MkOkPak0
betul/B0BaBlDiDkKaMiMkPaSna0l0
bincang/B0DuMkMuRa
budak/DkDRM0MkMRRaQ0Pao0
bujuk/D0DiM0MiP0Paa0n0o0
bulan/B0M0S0a0o0
bunuh/BID0M0O0P0PaT0a0nlo0
cas/MGMh
cek/MGPNPo
cengang/BaBIMkT0l0
cepat/BIBlBSKaM0MkMRPaPRRaS0SnT0nl
cinta/B0BkDiKaM0MiMkOiP0RaT0i0o0
cukup/BlKaMiMkS0Sna0k0l0
cuma/B0MuP0
cumbu-cumbu/B0Ba
cundang/K0M0MiMGMgMPMpP0PET0TK
cungkil/D0M0O0P0a0l0
dahulu/BIDiDkKaMiMkP0PaT0n0
dalam/DiDRKaM0MiMkMRPaPfS0T0a0o0
damai/BbDkKaMkMuP0PaRaTkl0o0
dana/DiMiP0Pa
dapat/B0BPD0DiKaM0MiMkMRP0PaS0SPT0a0i0k0nlo0
debat/B0DuM0MuP0RaRk
debus/B0
dedah/KuMkPaT0
dekret/Mk
derajat/MxS0
dingin/DkKaM0MkP0Pa
diri/B0BqDkMkOkP0PaT0k0l0o0
dril/MG
dua/B0BaK0KnM0MiMkMRMtMuMSMwMxP0PaR0S0SRn0
duduk/BlBPDiKaMiMkP0PaSlT0i0k0l0o0
eja/D0M0Paa0
empat-empat/B0Kn
format/M1n0
ganti/BaBbD0DkM0MkP0PaRaTkk0o0
gaul/B0M0MiMkMtMuRa
gojlok/M0MiPaa0
gung/Mh
hamba/B0DRM0MiMkMRMuPaRao0
harap/B0BaBkBqDkM0MkOkPaa0k0
hasil/BbDkKcMkOkP0PaPco0
hendak/BKDmK0KnMiSKnlo0
henti/BbDkMeMkMuP0PaPcRaT0a0k0n0
hidang/BaDkMkPaSaT0a0k0
huni/B0BPD0DiMiMkP0PaT0a0n0o0
ikut/B0DiM0MiMkMRMuP0T0a0i0nlo0
ingat/B0D0DkDtDuM0MiMkMtMuOkRaRiRkS0T0a0nlo0
jajar/B0DkM0MkMxPaPfRtS0T0a0
jalan/B0DiDkKtMiMkOkOiPERaS0Ssa0i0k0n0o0
jantung/B0M0a0o0
jempalit/BaM0a0
jengket/B0M0BIBS
jilid/B0D0M0P0Pa
juang/B0D0DuKaKqMuPER0RaSsk0
jundai/BISI
kabung/BbM0Rao0
kandang/MkRaS0o0
kasihan/DiMii0o0
kecup/KaM0a0
kehendak/A2Oii0
kembeng/M0
kencang/DkDRKaMkMRPa
keras/B0BIDkDRKaM0MiMkMRP0PaS0l0o0
kerja/BEDkMkMqOkPaPEPfS0SqThk0o0
kerlip/BEM0S0
kernyut/BEBfM0
kertak/BEM0Mk
ketahu/A2BqDiOiSqa0i0
ketidur/A2Bt
kira/D0DuM0MuPaRaSnT0Tka0n0
ladang/B0MRMtMuP0PaRao0
lajar/A2BEMpP0PaPn
laksana/DkMkOkP0PaT0k0
laku/B0BlDkDuKaKcMeMkMuO0P0PcR0RaRkS0k0n0
lalu/B0BlDiKaKuMiMkOiT0a0i0
lambat/B0DkKaKuMRMkT0
lampar/B0Ba
langgar/BaD0M0MkO0P0PaRaT0
laras/BaDvKaKtMiMkMxPaPvS0Sa
larat/KoM0MR
lawan/B0BaD0KaM0MiMkMuO0P0RaT0nlo0
lebar/DkDRM0MkMRPaS0n0
lem/MG
lengkap/B0BaDiDtKaMiMkMtPaP0RaS0n0
lengkok/B0BaBEBf
leter/BEM0MkP0
lumur/B0BaMgMiMka0i0
lunak/DkKaM0MiMkMRP0Pa
makna/B0MeMkn0
masalah/B0MkMuRao0
mata/B0BkS0i0o0
mengkelan/K0T0
milik/DiKaKqMiOiP0PaT0i0o0
mudah/DkDRKaMkMRP0S0
muka/B0BSDnMGMhMxP0PoRaS0TKo0
mulus/DkKaMkMR
nasihat/DiDkMiMkP0i0nlo0
niaga/B0DkDuM0MkMuP0Ra
olahraga/B0KaMeMk
padan/BaM0MkMSP0S0BSa0
pana/KuT0
panjang/B0BlDkDRKaM0MkMRPaPsS0T0n0
papar/DkM0MkPaa0
pelihara/D0M0MkO0P0PaT0a0l0o0
pengaruh/B0DiMiMmT0o0
perang-perang/Ba
percaya/D0DiDkKaMmMoMtOiTEi0k0
percik/BfD0DiDkM0MiMkPaTEa0k0
pergi/BfKanl
perintah/BqD0DkM0MiMkOkP0PaT0nlo0
persekot/MiMm
pertal/M0a0
pesona/D0M0MiMkMPMqT0
pihak/B0KcM0MiMkPaS0o0
pimpin/B0D0KaKqM0O0P0T0a0nlo0
politik/B0MkMuPa
pos/MGMhPo
poser/MM
prediksi/D0MMMo
prihatin/B0KaMo
produksi/B0MMP0Pa
program/D0DkMMT0P0Pan0
promosi/DkMo
puasa/Bbo0
pukul/D0DiM0MiMkMtMuP0PaT0a0nlo0
pul/MGPN
puluh/B0BaKSRaRtS0SQa0
punya/B0DiKaMmMo
putra/B0BkKaMko0
putus/BaDkKaBlM0MkOkT0TkP0Paa0k0nl
raga/B0M0MkMnP0PaPMPn
ragam/B0KaKtM0MkMxPvS0Sn
rangkai/B0M0MkMxP0PaS0a0
rasa/B0BqD0DiDkM0MiMkMuO0OkP0PaS0T0Tki0k0nl
ratus/KSM0MSP0RSS0SPSQa0
regang/BSM0MkPaa0
rempak/B0MSS0
ribu/KSMSS0SQa0
rintis/D0KqM0P0a0
rosot/KoM0Mk
rupa/B0BSKtM0MiMkMSMwMxP0RtS0T0n0
sahaja/B0DkKaM0MkMu
sakit/BPBqDiKaMiMkMRMtP0PaPfS0i0l0o0
samar/KaM0MkP0Paa0
samper/K0M0Mi
segar/DkKaMkMRP0Pak0l0
sembilan/B0K0KnSR
serban/BEBg
serimpet/K0M0
serius/KaMi
serta/BEDiKaMiMqMkPEPaPfn0o0
seteru/B0DiMiMuRa
stimulasi/M0
suami/B0BkDRMRMunlo0
suka/DiKaM0MiMkOiS0Sna0i0o0n0
sumpah/B0D0M0MiMuP0PaRao0
sungguh/B0BlKaMiMkMtPaSna0l0
tabik/BIM0
tagar/B0
tahu/BaBkKaKiMgO0PoS0l0
tanggungjawab/A2DuMiMuRa
taruh/B0BaBPBqD0DuM0MiMkMuPEPfRaa0nl
taut/B0DkMkMuRaa0
temu/BbDiDkM0MiMkMuOiOkP0PaRaTka0i0k0
tengah/DiM0MiMgMhP0RaS0Sna0o0
tepi/B0BkMkMha0n0
terang/BqDiDkKaM0MiMkP0Pak0l0o0
terjun/BfDkKuMiMkP0Pa
ternak/BEDkMkP0PEPfo0
tiga/B0K0KnM0MRR0RaSR
timba/B0BkD0M0P0PaT0Tkn0
timbal/B0BaKtM0MiP0S0a0
tren/MG
tubruk/BaD0K0M0MkT0a0
tubuh/B0BSMkMwRaRtS0o0
tuhan/B0BkKaMkMRMuo0
tulis/B0BkD0DiDkM0MiMkO0OkP0PaT0a0n0
tumpu/B0BkBSM0MkP0S0T0a0
tunang/BaDuMiMkMuPERaa0
ugahari/Ka
urap/B0DiM0MiPaa0
urus/BaD0DiK0KaKqM0MiMkP0PaT0a0nl
utuh/DkKaKtMkPaS0Sn
